District of Columbia statutes.
1-1162.12

Preliminary investigations.

(a)

The Director of Government Ethics shall conduct a preliminary investigation of a possible violation of the Code of Conduct or of this subchapter brought to the attention of the Director of Government Ethics or the Ethics Board through the following sources:

(1)

The media;

(2)

A tip received through the hotline; or

(3)

Documents filed with the Ethics Board.

(b)

If during or after the preliminary investigation, the Director of Government Ethics has reason to believe that a violation of the Code of Conduct or of this subchapter may have occurred, the Director of Government Ethics shall present evidence of the violation to the Ethics Board. Upon presentation of evidence, the Ethics Board may authorize a formal investigation and the issuance of subpoenas if it finds reason to believe a violation has occurred.

(c)

A preliminary investigation may be dismissed by the Director of Government Ethics or the Ethics Board if insufficient evidence exists to support a reasonable belief that a violation has occurred.

(d)

The identity of an individual who is the subject of the preliminary investigation shall not be disclosed without the individual’s consent unless or until the Ethics Board has found reason to believe that the individual has committed a violation and the Ethics Board finds that disclosure would not harm the investigation.

History

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 212, 59 DCR 1862
July 15, 2014, D.C. Law 20-122, § 2(d), 61 DCR 5688

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1162.14.

Effect of Amendments

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-122 inserted “of” following “violation” in subsection (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(d) of the Comprehensive Code of Conduct and BEGA Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-323, Apr. 28, 2014, 61 DCR 4681).